Idaho, session 2026, S1287.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-202, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-202. DESIGNATION OF HIGHWAYS AND PUBLIC RIGHTS-OF-WAY. (1) The
initial selection of the county highway system and highway district system
may be accomplished in the following manner:
(a) The board of county or highway district commissioners shall cause a
map to be prepared showing the general location of each highway and pub-
lic right-of-way in its jurisdiction, and the commissioners shall cause
notice to be given of intention to adopt the map as the official map of
that system, and shall specify the time and place at which all inter-
ested persons may be heard.
(b) After the hearing, the commissioners shall adopt the map, with any
changes or revisions considered by them to be advisable in the public
interest, as the official map of the respective highway system.
(2) If a county or highway district acquires an interest in real
property for highway or public right-of-way purposes, the respective com-
missioners shall:
(a) Cause Convene a public hearing and cause any order or resolution
enacted, and deed or other document establishing an interest in the
property for their highway system purposes, to be recorded in the county
records; or
(b) Cause the official map of the county or highway district system to
be amended as affected by the acceptance of the highway or public right-
of-way. and record a survey including a legal description for each seg-
ment acquired from privately owned lands; and
(c) Demonstrate payment was made when the land acquired was from a pri-
vately owned parcel.
Provided, however, a county with highway jurisdiction or highway district
may hold title to an interest in real property for public right-of-way pur-
poses without incurring an obligation to construct or maintain a highway
within the right-of-way until the county or highway district determines
that the necessities of public travel justify opening a highway within the


right-of-way. The lack of an opening shall not constitute an abandonment,
and mere use by the public shall not constitute an opening of the public
right-of-way.
(3) Highways laid out, recorded and opened as described in subsection
(2) of this section, by order of a board of commissioners, and all highways
used for a period of five (5) years, provided they shall have been worked and
kept up at the expense of the public, or located and recorded by order of a
board of commissioners, are highways. If a highway created in accordance
with the provisions of this subsection is not opened as described in subsec-
tion (2) of this section, there shall be no duty to maintain that highway,
nor shall there be any liability for any injury or damage for failure to main-
tain it or any highway signs, until the highway is designated as a part of the
county or highway district system and opened to public travel as a highway.
(4) When a public right-of-way is created in accordance with the provi-
sions of subsection (2) of this section, or section 40-203 or 40-203A, Idaho
Code, there shall be no duty to maintain that such public right-of-way, nor
shall there be any liability for any injury or damage for failure to maintain
it or any highway signs.
(5) Nothing in this section shall limit the power of any board of com-
missioners to subsequently include or exclude any highway or public right-
of-way from the county or highway district system.
(6) By July 1, 2005, and at least every five (5) years thereafter, the
board of county or highway district commissioners shall publish in map form
and make readily available a map generated by the same entity showing the
general location of all highways and public rights-of-way under its ju-
risdiction. Any board of county or highway district commissioners may be
granted an extension of time with approval of the legislature by adoption of
a concurrent resolution.
(7) Prior to designating a new highway or public right-of-way on the
official map, the board of county or highway district commissioners shall
confirm that no legal abandonment has occurred on the new highway or right-
of-way to be added to the official map. In addition, the board of county or
highway district commissioners shall have some basis indicating dedication,
purchase, prescriptive use or other means for the creation of a highway and
public right-of-way with evidentiary support.
(8) The board of county or highway district commissioners shall give
advance notice of hearing, by U.S. mail, to any landowner upon or within
whose land the highway or public right-of-way is located whenever a highway
or public right-of-way is proposed for inclusion on such map and the pub-
lic status of such highway or public right-of-way is not already a matter
of public record. The purpose of this official map is to put the public on
notice of those highways and public rights-of-way that the board of county
or highway district commissioners considers to be public. The inclusion or
exclusion of a highway or public right-of-way from such a map does not, in it-
self, constitute a legal determination of the public status of such highway
or public right-of-way. Any person may challenge, at any time, the inclusion
or exclusion of a highway or public right-of-way from such map by initiating
proceedings as described in section 40-208(7), Idaho Code.
(9) Nothing in this section or in any designation of the general loca-
tion of a highway or public right-of-way shall authorize the public highway


agency to assert or claim rights superior to or in conflict with any rights-
of-way that resulted from the creation of a facility for the transmission of
water which existed before the designation of the location of a highway or
public right-of-way.
SECTION 2. That Section 40-203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-203. ABANDONMENT AND VACATION OF COUNTY AND HIGHWAY DISTRICT SYS-
TEM HIGHWAYS OR PUBLIC RIGHTS-OF-WAY. (1) A board of county or highway dis-
trict commissioners, whichever shall have jurisdiction of the highway sys-
tem, shall use the following procedure to abandon and vacate any highway or
public right-of-way in the county or highway district system including those
which furnish public access to state and federal public lands and waters:
(a) The commissioners may by resolution declare their intention to
abandon and vacate any highway or public right-of-way or to reclassify a
public highway as a public right-of-way, where doing so is in the public
interest.
(b) Any resident, or property holder, within a the county or highway
district system, including the state of Idaho, any of its subdivisions,
or any agency of the federal government, may petition the respective
commissioners for abandonment and vacation of any highway or public
right-of-way within their highway system. The petitioner shall pay a
reasonable fee as determined by the commissioners to cover the cost of
the proceedings.
(c) The commissioners shall establish a hearing date or dates on the
proposed abandonment and vacation.
(d) The commissioners shall prepare a public notice stating their in-
tention to hold a public hearing to consider the proposed abandonment
and vacation of a highway or public right-of-way, which shall be made
available to the public not later than thirty (30) days prior to any
hearing and mailed to any person requesting a copy not more than three
(3) working days after any such request.
(e) At least thirty (30) days prior to any hearing scheduled by the com-
missioners to consider abandonment and vacation of any highway or pub-
lic right-of-way, the commissioners shall mail notice by United States
mail to known owners and operators of an underground facility, as de-
fined in section 55-2202, Idaho Code, that lies within the highway or
public right-of-way.
(f) At least thirty (30) days prior to any hearing scheduled by the
commissioners to consider abandonment and vacation of any highway
or public right-of-way, the commissioners shall mail notice to own-
ers of record of land abutting the portion of the highway or public
right-of-way proposed to be abandoned and vacated at their addresses
as shown on the county assessor's tax rolls and shall publish notice of
the hearing at least two (2) times if in a weekly newspaper or three (3)
times if in a daily newspaper, the last notice to be published at least
five (5) days and not more than twenty-one (21) days before the hearing.
(g) At the hearing, the commissioners shall verify that the road was
legally designated as set forth in section 40-202, Idaho Code, and ac-
cept all information relating to the proceedings. Any person, includ-


ing the state of Idaho or any of its subdivisions, or any agency of the
federal government, may appear and give testimony for or against aban-
donment.
(h) After completion of the proceedings and consideration of all re-
lated information, the commissioners shall decide whether the abandon-
ment and vacation of the highway or public right-of-way is in the public
interest of the highway jurisdiction affected by the abandonment or va-
cation. The decision whether or not to abandon and vacate the highway or
public right-of-way shall be written and shall be supported by findings
of fact and conclusions of law.
(i) If the commissioners determine that a highway or public right-of-
way parcel to be abandoned and vacated in accordance with the provisions
of this section has a fair market value of two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500) or more, a charge may be imposed upon the acquiring
entity, not in excess of the fair market value of the parcel, as a condi-
tion of the abandonment and vacation; provided, however, no such charge
shall be imposed on the landowner who originally dedicated such parcel
to the public for use as a highway or public right-of-way; and provided
further, that if the highway or public right-of-way was originally a
federal land right-of-way, said highway or public right-of-way shall
revert to a federal land right-of-way.
(j) The commissioners shall cause any order or resolution to be
recorded in the county records and the official map of the highway sys-
tem to be amended as affected by the abandonment and vacation.
(k) From any such decision, a resident or property holder within the
county or highway district system, including the state of Idaho or any
of its subdivisions, or any agency of the federal government, may ap-
peal to the district court of the county in which the highway or public
right-of-way is located pursuant to section 40-208, Idaho Code.
(2) No highway or public right-of-way or parts thereof shall be aban-
doned and vacated so as to leave any real property adjoining the highway
or public right-of-way without access to an established highway or public
right-of-way. The burden of proof shall be on the impacted property owner to
establish this fact.
(3) In the event of abandonment and vacation, rights-of-way or ease-
ments shall be reserved for the continued use of existing sewer, gas, water,
or similar pipelines and appurtenances, or other underground facilities as
defined in section 55-2202, Idaho Code, for ditches or canals and appurte-
nances, and for electric, telephone and similar lines and appurtenances.
(4)(a) When a county or highway district is to consider the abandonment
or vacation of any highway, public street or public right-of-way that
was accepted as part of a recorded platted subdivision, such abandon-
ment shall be accomplished pursuant to the provisions of this section.
(b) When a county or highway district is to consider the abandonment or
vacation of any highway, public street, or public right-of-way that was
accepted as part of a platted subdivision that has never been improved
or developed, such vacation or abandonment may be approved through
the dedication of a new highway, public street, or public right-of-way
without compensation as set forth in subsection (1)(i) of this section.


(c) When a county is to consider the abandonment or vacation of any pri-
vate right-of-way that was accepted as part of a recorded platted subdi-
vision, said abandonment or vacation shall be accomplished pursuant to
the provisions of chapter 13, title 50, Idaho Code.
(5) In any proceeding under this section or section 40-203A, Idaho
Code, or in any judicial proceeding determining the public status or width of
a highway or public right-of-way, a highway or public right-of-way shall be
deemed abandoned if the evidence shows:
(a) That said highway or public right-of-way was created solely by
a particular type of common law dedication, such as a dedication
based upon a plat, survey, or other document that was documents not
sufficiently recorded in the official records of an Idaho county;
(b) That said highway or public right-of-way is not located on land
owned by the United States or the state of Idaho nor on land entirely
surrounded by land owned by the United States or the state of Idaho nor
does it provide the only means of access to such public lands; and
(c)(i) That said highway or public right-of-way has not been used
by the public and has not been maintained at the expense of the pub-
lic in at least three (3) years during the previous fifteen (15)
years; or
(ii) Said highway or right-of-way was never constructed and at
least twenty (20) years have elapsed since the common law dedica-
tion.
(6) All other highways or public rights-of-way may be abandoned and va-
cated only upon a formal determination by the commissioners pursuant to this
section that retaining the highway or public right-of-way for use by the pub-
lic is not in the public interest, and such other highways or public rights-
of-way may be validated or judicially determined at any time notwithstanding
any other provision of law. Provided that any abandonment under this section
shall be subject to and limited by the provisions of subsections (2) and (3)
of this section.
SECTION 3. That Section 40-203A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-203A. VALIDATION OF COUNTY OR HIGHWAY DISTRICT SYSTEM HIGHWAY OR
PUBLIC RIGHT-OF-WAY. (1) Any resident or property holder within a the county
or highway district system, including the state of Idaho or any of its subdi-
visions, or any agency of the federal government, may petition the board of
county or highway district commissioners, whichever shall have jurisdiction
of the highway system, to initiate public proceedings to validate a highway
or public right-of-way, including those which furnish public access to state
and federal public lands and waters, provided that the petitioner shall pay
a reasonable fee as determined by the commissioners to cover the cost of the
proceedings, or the commissioners may initiate validation proceedings on
their own resolution, if any of the following conditions exist:
(a) If, through omission or defect, doubt exists as to the legal estab-
lishment or evidence of establishment of a highway or public right-of-
way;
(b) If the location of the highway or public right-of-way cannot be ac-
curately determined due to numerous alterations of the highway or pub-


lic right-of-way, a defective survey of the highway, public right-of-
way or adjacent property, or loss or destruction of the original survey
of the highways or public rights-of-way; or
(c) If the highway or public right-of-way as traveled and used does not
generally conform to the location of a highway or public right-of-way
described on the official highway system map or in the public records.
(2) If proceedings for validation of a highway or public right-of-way
are initiated, the commissioners shall follow the procedure set forth in
section 40-203, Idaho Code, and shall:
(a) If the commissioners determine it is necessary, cause the highway
or public right-of-way to be surveyed;
(b) Cause a report to be prepared, including verification that the
highway or public right-of-way was legally designated as set forth in
section 40-202, Idaho Code, and consideration of any survey and any
other information required by the commissioners;
(c) Establish a hearing date on the proceedings for validation;
(d) Cause notice of the proceedings to be provided in the same manner as
for abandonment and vacation proceedings; and
(e) At the hearing, the commissioners shall consider all information
relating to the proceedings and shall accept testimony from persons
having an interest in the proposed validation.
(3) Upon completion of the proceedings, the commissioners shall deter-
mine with a reasonably detailed analysis supported by findings of fact and
conclusion of law whether validation of the highway or public right-of-way
is in the public interest and shall enter an order validating the highway or
public right-of-way as public or declaring it not to be public.
(4) From any such decision, any resident or property holder within a the
county or highway district system, including the state of Idaho or, any of
its subdivisions, or any agency of the federal government, may appeal to the
district court of the county in which the highway or public right-of-way is
located pursuant to section 40-208, Idaho Code.
(5) When a board of commissioners validates a highway or public right-
of-way, it shall cause the order validating the highway or public right-of-
way, and if surveyed, cause the survey to be recorded in the county records
and shall amend the official highway system map of the respective county or
highway district.
(6) The commissioners shall proceed to determine and provide just com-
pensation for the removal of any structure that, prior to creation of the
highway or public right-of-way, encroached upon a highway or public right-
of-way that is the subject of a validation proceeding, or if such is not prac-
tical, the commissioners may acquire property to alter the highway or public
right-of-way being validated.
(7) This section does not apply to the validation of any highway, public
street or public right-of-way which is to be accepted as part of a platted
subdivision pursuant to chapter 13, title 50, Idaho Code.
(8) There shall be no duty to maintain or construct any highway or
right-of-way on the part of a county or highway district for those highways
or rights-of-way within the county or public right-of-way system. Absent
evidence to the contrary, there shall be a presumption that the highway or
right-of-way is valid.


SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.